New York, session 2025-2026, A6647.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph w of subdivision 3 of section 15 of the workers' 2 compensation law, as amended by section 1 of subpart A of part NNN of 3 chapter 59 of the laws of 2017, is amended and a new paragraph y is 4 added to read as follows: 5 w. Other cases. In all other cases of permanent partial disability, 6 the compensation shall be sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the 7 difference between the injured employee's average weekly wages and [his 8 or her] such injured employee's wage-earning capacity thereafter in the 9 same employment or otherwise. Compensation under this paragraph shall 10 be payable during the continuance of such permanent partial disability, 11 [without the necessity for the claimant who is entitled to benefits at 12 the time of classification to demonstrate ongoing attachment to the 13 labor market, but] subject to reconsideration of the degree of such 14 impairment by the board on its own motion or upon application of any 15 party in interest however, all compensation payable under this paragraph 16 shall not exceed (i) five hundred twenty-five weeks in cases in which 17 the loss of wage-earning capacity is greater than ninety-five percent; 18 (ii) five hundred weeks in cases in which the loss of wage-earning 19 capacity is greater than ninety percent but not more than ninety-five 20 percent; (iii) four hundred seventy-five weeks in cases in which the 21 loss of wage-earning capacity is greater than eighty-five percent but 22 not more than ninety percent; (iv) four hundred fifty weeks in cases in 23 which the loss of wage-earning capacity is greater than eighty percent 24 but not more than eighty-five percent; (v) four hundred twenty-five EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10555-01-5 A. 6647 2 1 weeks in cases in which the loss of wage-earning capacity is greater 2 than seventy-five percent but not more than eighty percent; (vi) four 3 hundred weeks in cases in which the loss of wage-earning capacity is 4 greater than seventy percent but not more than seventy-five percent; 5 (vii) three hundred seventy-five weeks in cases in which the loss of 6 wage-earning capacity is greater than sixty percent but not more than 7 seventy percent; (viii) three hundred fifty weeks in cases in which the 8 loss of wage-earning capacity is greater than fifty percent but not more 9 than sixty percent; (ix) three hundred weeks in cases in which the loss 10 of wage-earning capacity is greater than forty percent but not more than 11 fifty percent; (x) two hundred seventy-five weeks in cases in which the 12 loss of wage-earning capacity is greater than thirty percent but not 13 more than forty percent; (xi) two hundred fifty weeks in cases in which 14 the loss of wage-earning capacity is greater than fifteen percent but 15 not more than thirty percent; and (xii) two hundred twenty-five weeks in 16 cases in which the loss of wage-earning capacity is fifteen percent or 17 less. For a claimant with a date of accident or disablement after the 18 effective date of [the] section one of subpart A of part NNN of chapter 19 fifty-nine of the laws of two thousand seventeen that amended this 20 subdivision, where the carrier or employer has provided compensation 21 pursuant to subdivision five of this section beyond one hundred thirty 22 weeks from the date of accident or disablement, all subsequent weeks in 23 which compensation was paid shall be considered to be benefit weeks for 24 purposes of this section, with the carrier or employer receiving credit 25 for all such subsequent weeks against the amount of maximum benefit 26 weeks when permanent partial disability under this section is deter- 27 mined. In the event of payment for intermittent temporary partial disa- 28 bility paid after one hundred thirty weeks from the date of accident or 29 disablement, such time shall be reduced to a number of weeks, for which 30 the carrier will receive a credit against the maximum benefit weeks. For 31 a claimant with a date of accident or disablement after the effective 32 date of [the] section one of subpart A of part NNN of chapter fifty-nine 33 of the laws of two thousand seventeen that amended this subdivision, 34 when permanency is at issue, and a claimant has submitted medical 35 evidence that [he or she] such claimant is not at maximum medical 36 improvement, and the carrier has produced or has had a reasonable oppor- 37 tunity to produce an independent medical examination concerning maximum 38 medical improvement, and the board has determined that the claimant is 39 not yet at maximum medical improvement, the carrier shall not receive a 40 credit for benefit weeks prior to a finding that the claimant has 41 reached maximum medical improvement, at which time the carrier shall 42 receive credit for any weeks of temporary disability paid to claimant 43 after such finding against the maximum benefit weeks awarded under this 44 subdivision. For those claimants classified as permanently partially 45 disabled who no longer receive indemnity payments because they have 46 surpassed their number of maximum benefit weeks, the following 47 provisions will apply: 48 (1) There will be a presumption that medical services shall continue 49 notwithstanding the completion of the time period for compensation set 50 forth in this section and the burden of going forward and the burden of 51 proof will lie with the carrier, self-insured employer or state insur- 52 ance fund in any application before the board to discontinue or suspend 53 such services. Medical services will continue during the pendency of any 54 such application and any appeals thereto. 55 (2) The board is directed to promulgate regulations that establish an 56 independent review and appeal by an outside agent or entity of the A. 6647 3 1 board's choosing of any administrative law judge's determination to 2 discontinue or suspend medical services before a final determination of 3 the board. 4 y. Effect of attachment to labor market. Benefits or compensation 5 otherwise due under this section shall not be withheld, diminished, or 6 conditioned upon an injured worker's demonstration of attachment to the 7 labor market. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.